Nevada, session 83, SB1.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Legislative Fund created by NRS 218A.150 the sum of
$28,000,000 for the costs of the 83rd Legislative Session.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)